src/fst/morphology/stems/ojibwe_pronouns.lexc
LEXICON PRONSim+NA+ObvSg_PrefixBoundary
0:%<%< PronounStems ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONSim+NA+ObvSg                                           !
!         Stems                                                                !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONSim+NA+ObvSg_Stems
dinowan PRONSim+NA+ObvSg_Class=PRONSim+NA+ObvSg_Boundary ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONSim+NA+ObvSg, Class: PRONSim+NA+ObvSg                  !
!         Morpheme boundary between stem and suffix                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONSim+NA+ObvSg_Class=PRONSim+NA+ObvSg_Boundary
0:%>%> PRONSim+NA+ObvSg_Class=PRONSim+NA+ObvSg_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONSim+NA+ObvSg, Class: PRONSim+NA+ObvSg                  !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONSim+NA+ObvSg_Class=PRONSim+NA+ObvSg_Flags
@R.Prefix.NONE@ PRONSim+NA+ObvSg_Class=PRONSim+NA+ObvSg_Flags_Prefix=NONE ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONSim+NA+ObvSg, Class: PRONSim+NA+ObvSg                  !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NONE                                        !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONSim+NA+ObvSg_Class=PRONSim+NA+ObvSg_Flags_Prefix=NONE
@U.Order.Other@ PRONSim+NA+ObvSg_Class=PRONSim+NA+ObvSg_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONSim+NA+ObvSg, Class: PRONSim+NA+ObvSg, Prefix: NONE, Order: Other
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONSim+NA+ObvSg_Class=PRONSim+NA+ObvSg_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings
+PRONSim+NA+ObvSg: EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONSim+NA+ObvPl                                           !
!         Prefixes                                                             !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONSim+NA+ObvPl_Prefix
@P.Prefix.NONE@ PRONSim+NA+ObvPl_PrefixBoundary ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONSim+NA+ObvPl                                           !
!         Morpheme boundary between prefix and stem                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONSim+NA+ObvPl_PrefixBoundary
0:%<%< PronounStems ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONSim+NA+ObvPl                                           !
!         Stems                                                                !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONSim+NA+ObvPl_Stems
dinowa' PRONSim+NA+ObvPl_Class=PRONSim+NA+ObvPl_Boundary ;
dinowan PRONSim+NA+ObvPl_Class=PRONSim+NA+ObvPl_Boundary ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONSim+NA+ObvPl, Class: PRONSim+NA+ObvPl                  !
!         Morpheme boundary between stem and suffix                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONSim+NA+ObvPl_Class=PRONSim+NA+ObvPl_Boundary
0:%>%> PRONSim+NA+ObvPl_Class=PRONSim+NA+ObvPl_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONSim+NA+ObvPl, Class: PRONSim+NA+ObvPl                  !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONSim+NA+ObvPl_Class=PRONSim+NA+ObvPl_Flags
@R.Prefix.NONE@ PRONSim+NA+ObvPl_Class=PRONSim+NA+ObvPl_Flags_Prefix=NONE ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONSim+NA+ObvPl, Class: PRONSim+NA+ObvPl                  !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NONE                                        !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONSim+NA+ObvPl_Class=PRONSim+NA+ObvPl_Flags_Prefix=NONE
@U.Order.Other@ PRONSim+NA+ObvPl_Class=PRONSim+NA+ObvPl_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONSim+NA+ObvPl, Class: PRONSim+NA+ObvPl, Prefix: NONE, Order: Other
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONSim+NA+ObvPl_Class=PRONSim+NA+ObvPl_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings
+PRONSim+NA+ObvPl: EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONPer+NA+1Sg                                             !
!         Prefixes                                                             !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONPer+NA+1Sg_Prefix
@P.Prefix.NONE@ PRONPer+NA+1Sg_PrefixBoundary ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONPer+NA+1Sg                                             !
!         Morpheme boundary between prefix and stem                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONPer+NA+1Sg_PrefixBoundary
0:%<%< PronounStems ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONPer+NA+1Sg                                             !
!         Stems                                                                !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONPer+NA+1Sg_Stems
geniin PRONPer+NA+1Sg_Class=PRONPer+NA+1Sg_Boundary ;
niin PRONPer+NA+1Sg_Class=PRONPer+NA+1Sg_Boundary ;
niineta:niinetaw2 PRONPer+NA+1Sg_Class=PRONPer+NA+1Sg_Boundary ;
niinitam PRONPer+NA+1Sg_Class=PRONPer+NA+1Sg_Boundary ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONPer+NA+1Sg, Class: PRONPer+NA+1Sg                      !
!         Morpheme boundary between stem and suffix                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONPer+NA+1Sg_Class=PRONPer+NA+1Sg_Boundary
0:%>%> PRONPer+NA+1Sg_Class=PRONPer+NA+1Sg_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONPer+NA+1Sg, Class: PRONPer+NA+1Sg                      !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONPer+NA+1Sg_Class=PRONPer+NA+1Sg_Flags
@R.Prefix.NONE@ PRONPer+NA+1Sg_Class=PRONPer+NA+1Sg_Flags_Prefix=NONE ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONPer+NA+1Sg, Class: PRONPer+NA+1Sg                      !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NONE                                        !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
